Hawaii statutes.
[§658A-2] Notice. (a) Except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, a person gives notice to another person by
taking action that is reasonably necessary to inform the other person in
ordinary course, whether or not the other person acquires knowledge of the
notice.

(b) A person has notice if the person has
knowledge of the notice or has received notice.

(c) A person receives notice when it comes to
the person's attention or the notice is delivered at the person's place of
residence or place of business, or at another location held out by the person
as a place of delivery of such communications. [L 2001, c 265, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next